bg-BG: Тип на монтаж на работния цилиндър на съединителя: Работен цилиндър със щипка; Концентричен (CSC) / вътрешен аксиален лагер; Външен работен цилиндър на болтове; Външен работен цилиндър на конзола; Други
it: Tipo di montaggio del cilindro secondario della frizione: Cilindro secondario a incastro; Concentrico (CSC) / cuscinetto reggispinta interno; Cilindro secondario esterno bolt-on; Cilindro secondario esterno con staffa; Altro
fr: Type de montage du cylindre récepteur d’embrayage: Récepteur clipsable; Concentrique (CSC) / butée de débrayage interne; Récepteur externe boulonné; Récepteur externe sur support; Autre
nb: Monteringstype for clutch-slavesylinder: Slavesylinder med klips; Konsentrisk (CSC) / internt utløserlager; Ekstern påboltet slavesylinder; Ekstern slavesylinder med brakettfeste; Annet
ru: Тип крепления рабочего цилиндра сцепления: Рабочий цилиндр на защелках; Концентрический (CSC) / внутренний выжимной подшипник; Внешний рабочий цилиндр на болтах; Внешний рабочий цилиндр на кронштейне; Другое
el: Τύπος τοποθέτησης του κυλίνδρου αποδέσμευσης συμπλέκτη: Κουμπωτός βοηθητικός κύλινδρος συμπλέκτη; Ομόκεντρο (CSC) / εσωτερικό ρουλεμάν αποσύμπλεξης; Εξωτερικός βιδωτός βοηθητικός κύλινδρος συμπλέκτη; Εξωτερικός βοηθητικός κύλινδρος συμπλέκτη με βάση στήριξης; Άλλο
hr-HR: Vrsta montaže pomoćnog cilindra spojke: Radni cilindar na uskočnik; Koncentrični (CSC) / unutarnji potisni ležaj; Vanjski radni cilindar na vijke; Vanjski radni cilindar na nosaču; Ostalo
da: Monteringstype for koblingsslavecylinder: Clip-in-slavecylinder; Koncentrisk (CSC) / indvendigt udrykkerleje; Ekstern bolt-on-slavecylinder; Ekstern beslagmonteret slavecylinder; Andet
lt-LT: Sankabos darbinio cilindro montavimo tipas: Įsegamas darbinis cilindras; Koncentrinis (CSC) / vidinis išminamasis guolis; Išorinis prisukamas darbinis cilindras; Išorinis ant laikiklio montuojamas darbinis cilindras; Kita
ko: 클러치 슬레이브 실린더 장착형: 클립인 슬레이브 실린더; 동심원(CSC) / 내부 릴리스 베어링; 외부 볼트온 슬레이브 실린더; 외부 브래킷 장착 슬레이브 실린더; 기타
sv: Typ av montering för koppling med slavcylindrar: Klämmonterad slavcylinder; Koncentrisk (CSC)/internt urtrampningslager; Extern fastskruvad slavcylinder; Extern fästesmonterad slavcylinder; Övrigt
de: Montageart des Kupplungsnehmerzylinders: Clip-in Nehmerzylinder; Zentralausrücker (CSC) / internes Ausrücklager; Externer angeschraubter Nehmerzylinder; Externer Nehmerzylinder mit Halterung; Andere
sl-SI: Vrsta pritrditve pomožnega cilindra sklopke: Vtični delovni valj; Koncentrični (CSC)/notranji potisni ležaj; Zunanji privijačen delovni valj; Zunanji delovni valj na nosilcu; Drugo
pt-PT: Tipo de montagem do cilindro secundário da embraiagem: Cilindro recetor de encaixe; Concêntrico (CSC)/rolamento de desembraiagem interno; Cilindro recetor externo aparafusado; Cilindro recetor externo com suporte; Outro
nl: Koppeling hulpcilinder montagetype: Inklikbare koppelingshulpcilinder; Concentrisch (CSC)/intern druklager; Externe opschroefbare koppelingshulpcilinder; Externe koppelingshulpcilinder met beugelmontage; Overig
ro-RO: Tipul de montare al cilindrului secundar al ambreiajului: Cilindru receptor cu prindere tip clemă; Concentric (CSC) / rulment de presiune intern; Cilindru receptor extern cu înșurubare; Cilindru receptor extern cu prindere pe suport; Altele
sk-SK: Spôsob upevnenia pomocného valca spojky: Násuvný pracovný valec; Koncentrický (CSC) / vnútorné vypínacie ložisko; Externý skrutkovací pracovný valec; Externý pracovný valec s montážou na konzolu; Iné
vi: Loại lắp đặt xi lanh phụ ly hợp: Xi lanh con dạng kẹp; Đồng tâm (CSC) / vòng bi ngắt ly hợp trong; Xi lanh con bắt bu-lông ngoài; Xi lanh con gắn giá đỡ ngoài; Khác
cs: Typ montáže pomocného spojkového válce: Nacvakávací pracovní válec; Koncentrický (CSC) / vnitřní vypínací ložisko; Externí šroubovací pracovní válec; Externí pracovní válec s uchycením na držák; Jiné
ja: クラッチスレーブシリンダー取り付けタイプ: クリップインスレーブシリンダー; 同軸 (CSC) / インターナルレリーズベアリング; 外部ボルトオンスレーブシリンダー; 外部ブラケットマウントスレーブシリンダー; その他
fi: Kytkimen työsylinterin kiinnitystyyppi: Kiinnikkeellä kiinnitettävä työsylinteri; Keskitetty (CSC) / sisäinen painelaakeri; Ulkoinen pultattava työsylinteri; Ulkoinen kannakkeella kiinnitettävä työsylinteri; Muu
tr: Debriyaj alt merkezi montaj türü: Klipsli alt merkez silindiri; Eş merkezli (CSC) / içten ayırma rulmanı; Harici cıvatalı alt merkez silindiri; Harici braket montajlı alt merkez silindiri; Diğer
hu: Kuplung munkahenger rögzítési típusa: Bepattintható munkahenger; Koncentrikus (CSC) / belső kinyomócsapágy; Külső, csavarozható munkahenger; Külső, konzolos munkahenger; Egyéb
pl: Typ mocowania wysprzęglika sprzęgła: Wysprzęglik wciskany (na klips); Centralny (CSC) / wewnętrzne łożysko oporowe; Zewnętrzny wysprzęglik przykręcany; Zewnętrzny wysprzęglik mocowany na wsporniku; Inne
th: ประเภทการติดตั้งกระบอกสูบคลัตช์รอง: กระบอกสูบคลัตช์แบบคลิปอิน; แบบร่วมศูนย์ (CSC) / ลูกปืนกดคลัตช์ในตัว; กระบอกสูบคลัตช์แบบยึดน็อตภายนอก; กระบอกสูบคลัตช์แบบติดขายึดภายนอก; อื่นๆ
pt-BR: Tipo de montagem do cilindro auxiliar da embreagem: Cilindro escravo de encaixe rápido; Concêntrico (CSC) / rolamento de liberação interno; Cilindro escravo externo parafusado; Cilindro escravo externo com suporte; Outros
es: Tipo de montaje del cilindro esclavo del embrague: Cilindro esclavo con clip; Cojinete de desembrague concéntrico (CSC) / interno; Cilindro esclavo externo atornillable; Cilindro esclavo externo con soporte; Otro
en: Clutch slave cylinder mounting type: Clip-in slave cylinder; Concentric (CSC) / internal release bearing; External bolt-on slave cylinder; External bracket-mount slave cylinder; Other
zh-TW: 離合器分泵安裝類型: 卡扣式分泵; 同心 (CSC) / 內置釋放軸承; 外置螺栓固定分泵; 外置支架安裝分泵; 其他
zh-CN: 离合器分泵安装类型: 卡入式从动缸; 同心 (CSC) / 内部释放轴承; 外部螺栓固定式从动缸; 外部支架安装式从动缸; 其他